Utah statutes.
78B-7-205.   Service -- Income withholding -- Expiration.

(1)  If the court enters an ex parte child protective order or a child protective order, the court shall:

(a)  make reasonable efforts to ensure that the order is understood by the petitioner and the respondent, if present;

(b)  as soon as possible transmit the order to the county sheriff for service; and

(c)  by the end of the next business day after the order is entered, transmit electronically a copy of the order to any law enforcement agency designated by the petitioner and to the statewide domestic violence network described in Section 78B-7-113.

(2)  The county sheriff shall serve the order and transmit verification of service to the statewide domestic violence network described in Section 78B-7-113 in an expeditious manner.  Any law enforcement agency may serve the order and transmit verification of service to the statewide domestic violence network if the law enforcement agency has contact with the respondent or if service by that law enforcement agency is in the best interests of the child.

(3)  When an order is served on a respondent in a jail, prison, or other holding facility, the law enforcement agency managing the facility shall notify the petitioner of the respondent's release.  Notice to the petitioner consists of a prompt, good faith effort to provide notice, including mailing the notice to the petitioner's last-known address.

(4)  Child support orders issued as part of a child protective order are subject to mandatory income withholding under Title 62A, Chapter 11, Part 4, Income Withholding in IV-D Cases, and Title 62A, Chapter 11, Part 5, Income Withholding in Non IV-D Cases.

(5)  After notice, as provided in Rule 4 of the Utah Rules of Civil Procedure, and hearing, a court may modify or vacate a child protective order with a showing of substantial and material change in circumstances.

(6)  The child protective order expires 150 days after the date of the order unless a different date is set by the court.  The court may not set a date more than 150 days after the date of the order without a finding of good cause.  The court may review and extend the expiration date, but may not extend it to more than 150 days after the date of the order without a finding of good cause.

(7)  Notwithstanding Subsections (5) and (6), unless the judge orders otherwise all child protective orders expire when the subject of the order is 18 years of age, unless the judge vacates the order earlier.



Amended by Chapter 208, 2011 General Session

